Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10D

LIFE
INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Risk-based capital for insurers, see §§431:3-401 to 414.

PART I.
INDIVIDUAL LIFE INSURANCE, ANNUITIES

AND PURE
ENDOWMENT CONTRACTS

§431:10D-101 Scope. This part applies
to contracts of life insurance and annuities other than group life insurance,
group annuities and except as provided in section 431:10D-302, other than
industrial life insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next